Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-221
Sponsor, defined.

Sponsor means any person on whose behalf a solicitor gives a prize but who is not the seller offering a prize promotion.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 83.